Utah statutes.
59-14-207.5.   Transactions only with licensed manufacturers, importers, distributors, and retailers.

(1)  A manufacturer or importer may sell or distribute cigarettes to a licensee if that person is located or doing business in the state, including on any tribal lands located in the state.

(2)  An importer may obtain cigarettes only from a licensed manufacturer.

(3) (a)  A distributor may obtain cigarettes only from a licensed manufacturer, importer, or distributor.

(b)  A distributor may sell or distribute cigarettes to a person who is a licensed distributor or retailer, if that person is located or doing business in the state, including on any tribal lands in the state.

(4)  A retailer may obtain cigarettes only from a properly licensed person.



Enacted by Chapter 217, 2004 General Session

